Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Appointment to Judicial Office

§ 9-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 9-1-101 through 9-1-107, 25-3-53 and 25-3-55 the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed to them herein:

“Judicial office” means the position of judge of the Court of Appeals, chancery, circuit or county court judge, or Supreme Court Justice.

“Judicial officer” means a judge of the Court of Appeals, chancery, circuit or county court, or a Supreme Court Justice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 16, eff July 13, 1993 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 9-1-103.
Vacancy in office.

Whenever a vacancy shall occur in any judicial office by reason of death of an incumbent, resignation or retirement of an incumbent, removal of an incumbent from office, or creation of a new judicial office in which there has not heretofore been an incumbent, the Governor shall have the authority to appoint a qualified person to fill such vacancy to serve for the unexpired term or until such vacancy is filled by election as provided in Section 23-15-849, Mississippi Code of 1972. When a vacancy shall occur for any of the reasons enumerated in this section, the clerk of the court shall notify the Governor of such vacancy immediately.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 2, eff from and after April 25, 1989 (became law without the Governor’s signature).

§ 9-1-105.
Physical disability or sickness; absence of judicial officer from state, etc.; appointment of special judge to serve on emergency basis.

Whenever any judicial officer is unwilling or unable to hear a case or unable to hold or attend any of the courts at the time and place required by law by reason of the physical disability or sickness of such judicial officer, by reason of the absence of such judicial officer from the state, by reason of the disqualification of such judicial officer pursuant to the provision of Section 165, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any provision of the Code of Judicial Conduct, or for any other reason, the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court, with the advice and consent of a majority of the justices of the Mississippi Supreme Court, may appoint a person as a special judge to hear the case or attend and hold a court.

Upon the request of the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals, the senior judge of a chancery or circuit court district, the senior judge of a county court, or upon his own motion, the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court, with the advice and consent of a majority of the justices of the Mississippi Supreme Court, shall have the authority to appoint a special judge to serve on a temporary basis in a circuit, chancery or county court in the event of an emergency or overcrowded docket. It shall be the duty of any special judge so appointed to assist the court to which he is assigned in the disposition of causes so pending in such court for whatever period of time is designated by the Chief Justice. The Chief Justice, in his discretion, may appoint the special judge to hear particular cases, a particular type of case, or a particular portion of the court’s docket.

When a vacancy exists for any of the reasons enumerated in Section 9-1-103, the vacancy has not been filled within seven (7) days by an appointment by the Governor, and there is a pending cause or are pending causes in the court where the vacancy exists that in the interests of justice and in the orderly dispatch of the court’s business require the appointment of a special judge, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, with the advice and consent of a majority of the justices of the Mississippi Supreme Court, may appoint a qualified person as a special judge to fill the vacancy until the Governor makes his appointment and such appointee has taken the oath of office.

If the Chief Justice pursuant to this section shall make an appointment within the authority vested in the Governor by reason of Section 165, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, the Governor may at his election appoint a person to so serve. In the event that the Governor makes such an appointment, any appointment made by the Chief Justice pursuant to this section shall be void and of no further force or effect from the date of the Governor’s appointment.

When a judicial officer is unwilling or unable to hear a case or unable or unwilling to hold court for a period of time not to exceed two (2) weeks, the trial judge or judges of the affected district or county and other trial judges may agree among themselves regarding the appointment of a person for such case or such limited period of time. The trial judges shall submit a notice to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court informing him of their appointment. If the Chief Justice does not appoint another person to serve as special judge within seven (7) days after receipt of such notice, the person designated in such order shall be deemed appointed.

A person appointed to serve as a special judge may be any currently sitting or retired chancery, circuit or county court judge, Court of Appeals judge or Supreme Court Justice, or any other person possessing the qualifications of the judicial office for which the appointment is made; however, a judge or justice who was retired from service at the polls shall not be eligible for appointment as a special judge in the district in which he served prior to his defeat.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the need for an appointment pursuant to this section may be certified to the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court by any attorney in good standing or other officer of the court.

The order appointing a person as a special judge pursuant to this section shall describe as specifically as possible the duration of the appointment.

A special judge appointed pursuant to this section shall take the oath of office, if necessary, and shall, for the duration of his appointment, enjoy the full power and authority of the office to which he is appointed.

Any currently sitting justice or judge appointed as a special judge under this section shall receive no additional compensation for his or her service as special judge. Any other person appointed as a special judge hereunder shall, for the period of his service, receive compensation from the state for each day’s service a sum equal to 1/260ths of the current salary in effect for the judicial office; however, no retired chancery, circuit or county court judge, retired Court of Appeals judge or any retired Supreme Court Justice appointed as a special judge pursuant to this section may, during any fiscal year, receive compensation in excess of fifty percent (50%) of the current salary in effect for a chancery or circuit court judge. Any person appointed as a special judge shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of the official duties to which he may be appointed hereunder in the same manner as other public officials and employees as provided by Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

If any person appointed as such special judge is receiving retirement benefits by virtue of the provisions of the Public Employees’ Retirement Law of 1952, appearing as Sections 25-11-1 through 25-11-139, Mississippi Code of 1972, such benefits shall not be reduced in any sum whatsoever because of such service, nor shall any sum be deducted as contributions toward retirement under said law.

The Supreme Court shall have authority to prescribe rules and regulations reasonably necessary to implement and give effect to the provisions of this section.

Nothing in this section shall abrogate the right of attorneys engaged in a case to agree upon a member of the bar to preside in a case pursuant to Section 165 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

The Supreme Court shall prepare the necessary payroll for special judges appointed pursuant to this section and shall submit such payroll to the Department of Finance and Administration.

Special judges appointed pursuant to this section shall direct requests for reimbursement for travel expenses authorized pursuant to this section to the Supreme Court and the Supreme Court shall submit such requests to the Department of Finance and Administration. The Supreme Court shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations regarding the administration of travel expenses authorized pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 373, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 17; Laws, 2005, ch. 501, § 18, eff Jan. 1, 2007; Laws, 2014, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§ 9-1-107.
Senior judges.

Retired Court of Appeals, chancery, circuit or county court judges or retired Supreme Court Justices, who have served as a judge or justice for at least six (6) years and who are either at least sixty-two (62) years of age or are receiving state retirement benefits and who desire to be designated as senior judges of the State of Mississippi shall file a certificate for such designation with the Supreme Court. The certificate shall be in such form as prescribed by the Supreme Court. The filing of such certificate shall place such judge on senior status.

If judges who are placed on senior status are receiving retirement benefits by virtue of the provisions of the Public Employees’ Retirement Law of 1952, appearing as Sections 25-11-1 through 25-11-139, Mississippi Code of 1972, such benefits shall not be reduced in any sum whatsoever because of being placed on senior status or because of service as a special judge, pursuant to Section 9-1-105, nor shall any sum be deducted as contributions toward retirement under such law.

The Supreme Court shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the service and tenure of senior judges on senior status, and may remove from senior status any judge who does not comply with the dictates of this statute or who, without good cause, refuses appointment under Section 9-1-105.

Any person appointed as senior judge on senior status hereunder shall, for the period of his service as a special judge pursuant to Section 9-1-105, receive compensation from the state for each day’s service a sum equal to 1/260 of the current salary in effect for the judicial offices. Any person appointed as a senior judge on senior status shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of the official duties to which he may be appointed hereunder in the same manner as other public officials and employees as provided by Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. Each judge so serving shall make out an itemized account of the number of days he in good faith served, and make affidavit to same and file it with the Clerk of the Supreme Court. The said clerk shall issue a certificate showing the length of time such senior judge or judges on senior status served, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue its warrant therefor.

During tenure as a senior judge, senior judges shall be deemed active members of the Mississippi Conference of Judges and shall be required to satisfy the requirements of continuing judicial education.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 587, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 18; Laws, 2001, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 377, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 6, 2016).